Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.100

Applicability of health regulations.

All persons granted licenses or certificates under this chapter, shall be subject to the state and municipal regulations relating to the control of contagious diseases, the reporting and certifying to births and deaths, and all matters pertaining to public health; and all such reports shall be accepted as legal.

[ 1909 c 192 s 18; RRS s 10022.]

NOTES:

Public health and safety: Title 70 RCW.

Vital statistics: Chapter 70.58A RCW.